Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
8-7-1012. Trade secrets.

A public employer may withhold the specific chemical identity, including the chemical name and other specific identification of a hazardous chemical, from a material safety data sheet or workplace chemical list only if all the following conditions are met:

The claim that the information indicates that the specific chemical identity is being withheld as a trade secret;

The material safety data sheet or the chemical indicates that the specific chemical identity is being withheld as a trade secret;

All information contained in the material safety data sheet concerning the properties and effects of the hazardous chemical is disclosed; and

The specific chemical identity is made available to health professionals, employees, and their designated representatives under the same conditions as are set out in the Hazard Communication Standard, 29 C.F.R. § 1910.1200(i)(2)-(7), provided, the information disclosable to the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration under the Hazard Communication Standard shall also be disclosable to the Director of the Division of Labor.

The director, upon his or her initiative or upon request by a public employee, designated representative, or public employer, shall request any or all of the data substantiating the trade secret claim to determine whether the claim is valid. The director shall protect from disclosure all information coming into his or her possession that is marked as confidential and shall return all information so marked at the conclusion of his or her determination.

Any information marked confidential pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall not be disclosed during any administrative or judicial proceeding held pursuant to this section. Administrative hearings held pursuant to this section shall not be open to the public, but otherwise shall be held in a manner consistent with that provided for in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., for hearings in contested cases. The proponent of disclosure shall also have the right to be heard.

No employee of the State of Arkansas shall disclose any information designated as a trade secret other than within the provisions of this subchapter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the disclosure under any circumstances of process or percentages of mixture information that is a trade secret.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 12; 1991, No. 1172, § 12; 2019, No. 910, § 5275.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a)(4).

8-7-1013. Complaints and investigations.

Complaints received orally or in writing from public employees, their designated representatives, or public employers related to alleged violations of this subchapter shall be investigated in a timely manner by the Director of the Division of Labor.

Officers or duly designated representatives of the director shall have the right of entry into any workplace or work area of a public employer during normal business hours to inspect and investigate complaints within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner.

The director shall have the same powers, duties, and authority to administer and enforce the provisions of this subchapter as are contained in §§ 11-2-108, 11-2-115, 11-2-116, and 11-2-118. Provided, however, that if there is a conflict between the provisions of this subchapter and the provisions of §§ 11-2-108, 11-2-115, 11-2-116, and 11-2-118, the provisions of this subchapter shall prevail.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 13; 1991, No. 1172, § 13; 2019, No. 910, § 5276.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a).

8-7-1014. Enforcement.

If the Director of the Division of Labor determines that a public employer has violated a provision of this subchapter, the director shall issue an order to the official responsible for performing the duties required by this subchapter directing that official to cease and desist the act or omission constituting the violation. Such an order shall constitute prima facie evidence of a violation in any enforcement action filed pursuant to § 8-7-1015.

If the director determines that a public employer has violated § 8-7-1008 relating to public employee information and training and within sixty (60) days of issuance of a cease and desist order the public employer has not remedied the violation, the director may conduct a program or programs to remedy the violation and require such public employer to reimburse the director for the cost of doing so.

Violation of this subchapter by a public employer shall be cause for adverse personnel action against the supervisor or supervisors responsible for the violation, including, but not limited to, suspension, demotion, withholding of annual career service recognition payments, or, in the case of serious and repeated violations, termination. Issuance of a cease and desist order by the director shall not be a prerequisite for such adverse personnel action, but such action shall only be taken in accordance with the civil service laws and rules.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 14; 1991, No. 1172, § 14; 2019, No. 315, § 680; 2019, No. 910, § 5277.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the second sentence of (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a).

8-7-1015. Cause of action — Attorney's fees.

Any citizen denied the rights granted to him or her by this subchapter may commence a civil action against a public employer or responsible official of a public employer in the Pulaski County Circuit Court or the circuit court of the residence of the aggrieved party, if an agency of the state is involved, or any of the circuit courts of the appropriate judicial districts when any other public employer is involved. Issuance of a cease and desist order by the Director of the Division of Labor shall not be a prerequisite to the commencement of such an action.

Upon written application of the person denied the rights provided for in this subchapter or any interested party, the circuit court having jurisdiction shall fix a day the petition is to be heard within seven (7) days of the date of the application of the petitioner and shall hear and determine the case.

The circuit courts shall have jurisdiction to restrain violations of this subchapter and to order all appropriate relief, including, but not limited to, the disclosure of chemical information, the rehiring or reinstatement of public employees discriminated against because of their exercise of their rights under this subchapter, and the payment of any compensation such public employees actually lost as a result of such violations.

Those who refuse to comply with the orders of the circuit court shall be found guilty of contempt of court.

In any action to enforce the rights granted by this subchapter or in any appeal therefrom, the court shall assess against the defendant reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation expenses reasonably incurred by a plaintiff who has substantially prevailed, unless the court finds that the position of the defendant was substantially justified or that other circumstances make an award of those expenses unjust. However, no expenses shall be assessed against the State of Arkansas or any of its agencies or departments. If the defendant has substantially prevailed in the action, the court may assess expenses against the plaintiff only upon a finding that the action was initiated primarily for frivolous or dilatory purposes.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 15; 1991, No. 1172, § 15; 2019, No. 910, § 5278.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a).

8-7-1016. No effect on other legal duties.

The provision of information to a public employee pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter shall not be construed to affect the liability of a public employer with regard to the health and safety of a public employee or other persons exposed to hazardous chemicals, nor shall it affect the public employer's responsibility to take any action to prevent the occurrence of occupational disease as required under any other provision of law. The provision of information to a public employee shall not affect any other duty or responsibility of a chemical manufacturer or distributor to warn ultimate users of a hazardous chemical under any other provision of law.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 556, § 16; 1991, No. 1172, § 16.

Subchapter 11
— Voluntary Cleanup

Effective Dates.

Acts 2003, No. 1193, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an urgent need to return abandoned, idled, and underused industrial, commercial, and agricultural properties, otherwise known as Brownfield sites, to productive uses; that the state would benefit by allowing grant funds already received from the federal government, as well as future grant awards and other moneys received by the Department of Environmental Quality, to be used to clean-up Brownfield sites; that a successful revolving loan fund program will assist the department to reach its goal of returning Brownfield sites to productive uses. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-1101. Declaration of policy.

The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:

The redevelopment of abandoned industrial, commercial, or agricultural sites or abandoned residential property should be encouraged as a sound land use management policy to prevent the needless development of prime farmland, open spaces, and natural and recreation areas and to prevent urban sprawl;

The redevelopment of abandoned sites should be encouraged so that these abandoned sites can be returned to useful, tax-producing properties to protect existing jobs and provide new job opportunities;

Persons interested in redeveloping abandoned sites should have a method of determining what their legal liabilities and cleanup responsibilities will be as they plan the reuse of abandoned sites;

Incentives should be put in place to encourage prospective purchasers to voluntarily develop and implement cleanup plans of abandoned sites without the need for adversarial enforcement actions by the Division of Environmental Quality;

The division now routinely determines, through its permitting policies, when contamination will and will not pose unacceptable risks to public health or the environment, and similar concepts are used in establishing cleanup policies for abandoned sites;

Parties and persons responsible under the law for pollution at abandoned sites should perform remedial responses which are fully consistent with existing requirements;

As an incentive to promote the redevelopment of abandoned industrial sites, persons not responsible for preexisting pollution at or contamination on abandoned industrial sites should meet alternative cleanup requirements if they acquire title after the nature of conditions at the abandoned industrial site has been disclosed and declare and commit to a specified future land use of the subject abandoned industrial site; and

Property transactions at times necessitate title acquisition prior to completion of the actions contemplated at § 8-7-1104(b)-(d) by persons not previously involved with the abandoned site or otherwise considered responsible parties for environmental conditions at an abandoned site.

These persons should not be foreclosed from participation under the procedures enacted under this subchapter.

Therefore, these persons, at the discretion of the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, may submit a letter of intent that will set forth the persons' desire to purchase the abandoned site and retain their eligibility for participation in the voluntary cleanup program established by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1042, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 108; 2001, No. 164, § 1; 2005, No. 1164, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2827.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (4); and substituted “division” for “department” in (5).

8-7-1102. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Abandoned site” means a site on which industrial, commercial, or agricultural activity occurred and for which no responsible person can reasonably be pursued for a remedial response to clean up the site or residential property or when the Division of Environmental Quality determines it is in the best interest of the citizens of Arkansas to promote redevelopment under this subchapter while continuing to pursue the responsible party or parties;

“Implementing agreement” means a plan, order, memorandum of agreement, or other enforceable document issued by the division under provisions of the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., the Remedial Action Trust Fund Act, § 8-7-501 et seq., or this subchapter, to implement the voluntary cleanup process described in § 8-7-1104;

“Industrial, commercial, or agricultural activity” means commercial, manufacturing, agricultural, or any other activity done to further the development, manufacturing, or distribution of goods and services, as well as soil cultivation and crop or livestock production, including, but not limited to, research and development, warehousing, shipping, transport, remanufacturing, repair, and maintenance of commercial machinery and equipment;

“Property” means property and improvements, including:

A facility as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 9601; and

A site as defined in § 8-7-203;

“Prospective purchaser” means a person who expresses a willingness to acquire an abandoned site and is not responsible for any preexisting pollution at or contamination on the abandoned site;

“Residential property” means any real property used as a dwelling or property with four (4) or fewer dwelling units used exclusively for residential use; and

“Site assessment” means the site assessment to establish the baseline level of existing contamination on a site.

At a minimum, the assessment shall identify the location and extent of contamination, the quantity or level of contamination, the type of contamination, the probable source of contamination, and the risk or threat associated with the contamination as described in § 8-7-1104.

The assessment also shall include a description of the intended land use of the site.

Any other terms of this subchapter not expressly defined shall have the same definitions as provided in § 8-7-203, § 8-7-304, or § 8-7-503, unless manifestly inconsistent with the provisions and remedial intent of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1042, § 1; 2001, No. 164, § 2; 2005, No. 1164, § 2; 2019, No. 693, § 30; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2828, 2829.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted “§ 8-7-403 [repealed]” following “§ 8-7-304” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(2).

8-7-1103. Division's authority.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall have authority regarding a voluntary response program to provide the following:

Opportunities for technical assistance for voluntary response actions;

Adequate opportunities for public participation, including prior notice and opportunity for comment in appropriate circumstances, in selecting response actions;

Streamlined procedures to ensure expeditious voluntary response actions;

Oversight and enforcement authorities or other mechanisms that are adequate to ensure that:

Voluntary response actions will protect human health and the environment and be conducted in accordance with applicable federal and state laws; and

If the person conducting the voluntary response action fails to complete the necessary response activities, including operation and maintenance or long-term monitoring activities, the necessary response activities are completed;

Mechanisms for approval of a voluntary response action plan; and

A requirement for certification or similar documentation from the division to the person conducting the voluntary response action indicating that the response is complete.

This certification shall document any conditions, restrictions, or limitations on the release from liability for contamination existing at the site before the division and the prospective purchaser enter into an implementing agreement.

The division may establish and administer a revolving loan fund to make secured and unsecured loans or grants to eligible participants for the purpose of financing the assessment, investigation, or remedial actions at abandoned industrial, commercial, or agricultural sites, or at abandoned residential property.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1042, § 1; 2003, No. 1193, § 1; 2005, No. 1164, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2830-2832.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-7-1104. Voluntary cleanup process.

This section applies:

To a person who:

Is a prospective purchaser of an abandoned industrial, commercial, or agricultural property with known or suspected contamination;

Is a prospective purchaser of abandoned residential property;

Did not by act or omission cause or contribute to any release or threatened release of a hazardous substance on or from the identified abandoned site or is otherwise considered to be a responsible party pursuant to § 8-7-512(a)(2)-(4); and

Will reuse or redevelop the property for industrial, commercial, agricultural, or residential uses which will sustain or create employment opportunities or otherwise augment the local or state economy and tax base, or both; or

To a person who:

Is not a responsible party pursuant to § 8-7-512(a)(2)-(4);

Submits a letter of intent to participate; and

Subsequently acquires title to an abandoned site prior to completion of an implementing agreement as set forth in subsection (d) of this section.

A comprehensive site assessment shall be completed to establish the baseline of existing contamination on the site.

Following completion of a comprehensive site assessment, the Division of Environmental Quality shall determine whether the site assessment adequately identifies the environmental risks posed by the abandoned site.

The division and the prospective purchaser shall enter into an implementing agreement based on the results of the comprehensive site assessment.

The implementing agreement shall establish cleanup liabilities and obligations for the abandoned site.

The prospective purchaser shall provide notice of the implementing agreement in a newspaper of general circulation that serves the area in which the abandoned site is located.

The notice shall be subject to the approval of the division.

The implementing agreement shall establish the intended use of the property.

The description of the intended use shall identify the abandoned site and the nature of the activity that the prospective purchaser proposes for the abandoned site.

Once the prospective purchaser has acquired legal title to the abandoned site, the purchaser will be responsible to:

Remediate, remove and properly dispose of, or manage, consistent with applicable requirements, any containerized hazardous substances existing on site at the time of purchase, including drummed waste, lagoons, and impoundments and wastes in aboveground and underground tanks, which may pose a threat of release.

Wastes that are disposed or managed on site will remain subject to applicable requirements;

Take all necessary steps as appropriate to prevent migration of hazardous substances beyond the property boundary, considering the factors specified at subsection (h) of this section; and

Remedy any releases of hazardous substances as identified in the comprehensive site assessment required by subsection (b) of this section.

For purposes of subdivision (e)(3) of this section, releases of hazardous substances are those conditions which pose either:

An unacceptable risk, either acute or chronic, to the health of employees or any other person likely to be exposed to the release from the abandoned site, based upon the intended site use described by the prospective purchaser in the comprehensive site assessment and described by the implementing agreement.

A purchaser may not actually use the property in a manner which differs from the intended use identified in the implementing agreement contemplated by subsection (d) of this section, unless the division and purchaser agree to a modification of the implementing agreement; or

An unacceptable risk to degrade either groundwaters or surface waters, or any risk to degrade the extraordinary resource waters of the State of Arkansas.

A remedial action pursuant to subdivision (e)(3) of this section shall eliminate unacceptable risks and prevent degradation of groundwaters and surface waters which would cause the unacceptable risk or degradation, or both, described in subdivision (f)(2) of this section.

The selection of remedial action shall be approved by the division after reasonable notice and after opportunity for hearing and shall become an amendment to the implementing agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.

Selection of a remedial action shall include consideration of the following factors:

The intended and allowable use of the abandoned site;

The ability of the contaminants to move in a form and manner which would result in exposure to humans and the surrounding environment at levels considered to be an unacceptable health risk as described in subdivisions (f)(1) and (2) of this section;

Consideration of the potential environmental risks of proposed alternative remedial action and its technical feasibility, reliability, and cost effectiveness;

When an imminent and substantial endangerment is posed; and

Whether institutional or engineering controls eliminate or partially eliminate the imminent and substantial endangerment or otherwise contain or prevent migration.

Remedial actions pursuant to subdivision (e)(3) of this section are not required to provide for the removal or remediation of the conditions or contaminants causing a release or threatened release on the abandoned site if:

Contaminants pose no unacceptable risk as described in subdivisions (f)(1) and (2) of this section, or if the remedial actions proposed in the site assessment and intended uses of the abandoned site will eliminate unacceptable risks as described in subdivisions (f)(1) and (2) of this section; or

Activities required to allow the intended reuse or redevelopment of the abandoned site are in a manner which will protect public health and the environment as described in subdivisions (f)(1) and (2) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall relieve the prospective purchaser, after acquisition of legal title to the abandoned site, of any liability for contamination later caused by the purchaser.

A prospective purchaser of an abandoned site under this subchapter shall not be responsible for paying any fines or penalties levied against any person responsible for contamination on the abandoned site prior to the implementing agreement with the division.

Once the prospective purchaser has acquired legal title to the abandoned site, the purchaser shall take all the steps necessary to prevent aggravating or contributing to the contamination of the air, land, or water, including downward migration of contamination from any existing contamination on the abandoned site.

The purchaser shall not use or redevelop the abandoned site in any way which is likely to interfere with subsequent remedial actions or in a manner that differs from the intended use established in the implementing agreement described in subsection (d) of this section.

A restriction shall be placed on the deed for the property covered by this subchapter, which restricts the use of the property to activities and compatible uses that will protect the integrity of any remedial action measures implemented on the property.

Upon written notice to the division, the implementing agreement, including all rights and cleanup liabilities entered into by the division and the prospective purchaser under subsection (d) of this section, is transferable in its entirety to all subsequent owners of the property who did not, by act or omission, cause or contribute to any release or threatened release of hazardous substances on the abandoned site.

Subsequent owners shall receive a copy of the implementing agreement from the prospective purchaser and shall not use the abandoned site in a manner which is inconsistent with the intended use described in the implementing agreement authorized by subsection (d) of this section.

Within thirty (30) days of the date that the prospective purchaser acquires legal title to the abandoned site, the purchaser shall file a notice of the implementing agreement with the clerk of the circuit court in the county in which the abandoned site is located.

Notice of any subsequent amendments to the implementing agreement shall also be filed with the clerk of the circuit court within thirty (30) days after their effective dates.

The clerk of the circuit court shall docket and record the notice so that it appears in the purchaser's chain of title.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1042, § 1; 2001, No. 164, § 3; 2005, No. 1164, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2833-2838.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d)(4) and throughout the rest of the section.

Subchapter 12
— Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide Disposal Act

Cross References.

Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator Disposal Trust Fund, § 19-5-998.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-1201. Title.

This subchapter may be known and may be cited as the “Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide Disposal Act”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1174, § 1.

8-7-1202. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to protect the citizens of the state and the environment by providing for the safe and proper disposal of abandoned pesticides used in agriculture and for other uses. Furthermore, it is the purpose of this subchapter to create an Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board to review and approve proposed pesticide disposal projects, select contractors to dispose of abandoned pesticides used in agriculture and for other uses, and approve payments from the Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator Disposal Trust Fund.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1174, § 1; 2001, No. 1130, § 1.

8-7-1203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Abandoned” means chemicals which are no longer used and for which there is no planned use;

“Advisory board” means the Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board;

“Contractor” means a person who provides services for a fee involving the disposal of abandoned pesticides;

“Fund” means the Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator Disposal Trust Fund;

“Pesticide” means any substance or mixture of substances intended for prevention, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pests, or any substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant, and any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as a spray adjuvant and for other uses; and

“Plant regulator” means any substance or mixture of substances intended through physiological action to accelerate or retard the rate of growth of maturation or to otherwise alter the behavior of plants or the produce thereof.

“Plant regulator” does not include substances to the extent that they are intended as plant nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculates, or soil amendments.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1174, § 1; 2001, No. 1130, § 2.

8-7-1204. Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board.

There is created the Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board.

The board shall be composed of up to six (6) members:

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation;

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;

One (1) member shall be a representative from the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service;

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Division of Environmental Quality;

One (1) member may be a representative from the United States Natural Resources Conservation Service; and

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Department of Agriculture, who shall serve as the Chair of the Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1174, § 1; 2001, No. 1130, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 43.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(4), and substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “State Plant Board” in (b)(6).

8-7-1205. Powers and duties of the board.

The Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board shall have the following powers and duties:

To identify any abandoned pesticides which shall be excluded from the collection and disposal program;

To advise and make recommendations to the State Plant Board regarding projects for collecting and disposing of abandoned pesticides;

To advise and make recommendations to the State Plant Board on the issuance of requests for proposals from contractors;

To review and evaluate proposals for the collection and disposal of abandoned pesticides;

To select proposals for the collection and disposal of abandoned pesticides to be implemented; and

To approve payments from the Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator Disposal Trust Fund for collection and disposal projects.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1174, § 1; 2001, No. 1130, § 4.

8-7-1206. Abandoned pesticide disposal.

Moneys received into the Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator Disposal Trust Fund shall be from gifts, grants, or funds from entities other than the State Plant Board and from a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per registered pesticide per registrant per year levied by the State Plant Board for the specific purpose of funding the disposal of abandoned pesticides.

This fee shall be known as the “Abandoned Pesticide Disposal Fee” and shall not be a part of the pesticide registration fee collected pursuant to § 2-16-407(f).

The Abandoned Pesticide Disposal Fee shall not apply to products classified as:

“Sanitizers and disinfectants” by the State Plant Board;

Aerosol products which are not labeled for agricultural use;

Insect repellants which are labeled for use on the human body or clothing;

Silica gels and other nonvolatile ready-to-use paste, foam, or gel formulations of insecticidal baits;

Nonvolatile insecticidal baits in tamper-resistant bait stations;

Insecticidal flea and tick collars and spot-on flea treatments for dogs and cats; or

Insecticidal cattle ear tags.

Collection of the Abandoned Pesticide Disposal Fee shall be discontinued upon completion of the abandoned pesticide collection program.

Moneys received into the fund shall be utilized by the State Plant Board, as authorized by the Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board, to pay for projects and other activities relating to the collection and disposal of abandoned pesticides and for administrative support.

The total allocation of funds for administrative support shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per biennium.

The State Plant Board shall administer the program relating to the collection and disposal of abandoned pesticides, as authorized by the Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board.

The duties of the State Plant Board shall include:

Developing and issuing requests for proposals from contractors to collect and dispose of abandoned pesticides;

Contracting for the collection and disposal of abandoned pesticides; and

Paying contractors for services relating to the collection and disposal of abandoned pesticides.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1174, § 1; 2001, No. 1130, § 5.

Subchapter 13
— Phase I Environmental Site Assessment Consultant Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-1301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Phase I Environmental Site Assessment Consultant Act”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1; 2007, No. 1018, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “‘Phase I Environmental Site Assessment Consultant Act’” for “‘Environmental Site Assessment Consultant and Hazardous Substance Response Contractor Certification Act.’”

8-7-1302. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to authorize the Division of Environmental Quality to establish and administer a certification program to maintain a list of Phase I consultants who meet the minimum qualifications for an environmental professional who undertakes a Phase I environmental site assessment, referred to as “all appropriate inquiry” under the Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act, Pub. L. No. 107-118, as it exists on January 1, 2007, or a Phase I environmental site assessment under the American Society for Testing and Materials standard E1527-05 as in effect on January 1, 2007.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1; 2007, No. 1018, § 1;
2019, No. 910, § 2839.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

U.S. Code.

The Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act, Pub. L. No. 107-118, referred to in this section, is codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 9601, 9604, 9605, 9607, 9622, and 9628.

8-7-1303. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, joint-stock company or trust, venture, state or the United States Government or agency, or any other legal entity however organized;

“Phase I consultant” means a person that performs a Phase I environmental site assessment for a fee or in conjunction with other services for which a fee is charged; and

“Phase I environmental site assessment” means an assessment defined as “all appropriate inquiry” under the Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act, Pub. L. No. 107-118, and the rules promulgated under the Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act or a Phase I environmental site assessment as that term is used in the American Society for Testing and Materials standard E1527-00 as in effect on January 1, 2005.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 120; 2007, No. 1018, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to Acts 2007, No. 827, § 240, the amendment of § 8-7-1303 by Acts 2007, No. 1018, § 1, supersedes the amendment of § 8-7-1303 by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 120.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 827 deleted former (1), (4), and (5) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted “the Emergency Response Fund Act, § 8-7-401 et seq.” following “§ 8-7-201 et seq.” in present (1) and (10)(B); substituted “comprehensive site assessment” for “comprehensive environmental site assessment” in present (2) and (4); rewrote present (5) and (6); substituted “environmental site assessment consultant” for “consultant” in present (8); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendment by No. 1018 deleted former (1) through (9); redesignated former (10) through (12) as present (1) through (3); in (3), deleted “a Phase I environmental site assessment as that term is used in the American Society for Testing and Materials standard E1527-00 as in effect on January 1, 2005”; deleted (13); and made related changes.

U.S. Code.

The Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act, Pub. L. No. 107-118, referred to in this section, is codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 9601, 9604, 9605, 9607, 9622, and 9628.